Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-115
Nebraska Statehood Memorial; Nebraska State Historical Society; restoration.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be responsible for the restoration of the Nebraska Statehood Memorial. The exterior shall be restored as nearly as may be to its appearance in 1870. The interior shall be restored as nearly as may be to its original appearance and arrangement, and shall be refurnished with authentic period furniture and other materials which relate to the establishment and development of Nebraska state government.

Laws 1965, c. 556, § 2, p. 1839.